apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_adj.ca.dix
<pardef n="gros__adj"><e><p><l>ses</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>sa</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>sos</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>síssimes</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>síssima</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>síssims</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>síssim</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="multimèdia__adj"><e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="ali/è__adj"><e><p><l>enes</l><r>è<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ena</l><r>è<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ens</l><r>è<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>è</l><r>è<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e r="LR"><p><l>é</l><r>è<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="r/àpid__adj"><e><p><l>àpides</l><r>àpid<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>àpida</l><r>àpid<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>àpids</l><r>àpid<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>àpid</l><r>àpid<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>apidíssimes</l><r>àpid<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>apidíssima</l><r>àpid<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>apidíssims</l><r>àpid<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>apidíssim</l><r>àpid<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="ambig/u__adj"><e><p><l>ües</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ua</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>us</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="ing/enu__adj"><e><p><l>ènues</l><r>enu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ènua</l><r>enu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>enus</l><r>enu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>enu</l><r>enu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="imprec/ís__adj"><e><p><l>ises</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>isa</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>isos</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ís</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>

<pardef n="adept/e__adj"><e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>a</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>

<pardef n="indon/esi__adj"><e><p><l>èsies</l><r>esi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>èsia</l><r>esi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>esis</l><r>esi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>esi</l><r>esi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="marr/ó__adj"><e><p><l>ons</l><r>ó<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ons</l><r>ó<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ó</l><r>ó<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ó</l><r>ó<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="cont/inu__adj"><e><p><l>ínues</l><r>inu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ínua</l><r>inu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>inus</l><r>inu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>inu</l><r>inu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="ros__adj"><e><p><l>ses</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>sa</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>sos</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="triparti/t__adj"><e><p><l>des</l><r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>da</l><r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ts</l><r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>t</l><r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="ce/c__adj"><e><p><l>gues</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ga</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>cs</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="access/ori__adj"><e><p><l>òries</l><r>ori<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>òria</l><r>ori<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>oris</l><r>ori<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ori</l><r>ori<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="su/ís__adj"><e><p><l>ïsses</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ïssa</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ïssos</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ís</l><r>ís<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="belg/a__adj"><e><p><l>ues</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ues</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="ami/c__adj"><e><p><l>gues</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ga</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>cs</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>c</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>guíssima</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>guíssims</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>guíssim</l><r>c<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="trist__adj"><e><p><l>es</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>os</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e r="LR"><p><l>s</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l/><r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="heterog/eni__adj"><e><p><l>ènies</l><r>eni<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ènia</l><r>eni<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>enis</l><r>eni<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>eni</l><r>eni<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="err/oni__adj"><e><p><l>ònies</l><r>oni<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ònia</l><r>oni<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>onis</l><r>oni<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>oni</l><r>oni<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="interm/edi__adj"><e><p><l>èdies</l><r>edi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>èdia</l><r>edi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>edis</l><r>edi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>edi</l><r>edi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>
<pardef n="amf/ibi__adj"><e><p><l>íbies</l><r>ibi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>íbia</l><r>ibi<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ibis</l><r>ibi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e><e><p><l>ibi</l><r>ibi<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e></pardef>

<e lm="femella"><i>femella</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rescissori"><i>resciss</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aliè"><i>ali</i><par n="ali/è__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ràpid"><i>r</i><par n="r/àpid__adj"/></e>
<e lm="combinatori"><i>combinat</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="xilè"><i>xil</i><par n="ali/è__adj"/></e>
<e lm="contigu"><i>contig</i><par n="ambig/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="isòsceles"><i>isòsceles</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="inexacte"><i>inexact</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ingenu"><i>ing</i><par n="ing/enu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="violeta"><i>violeta</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="precís"><i>prec</i><par n="imprec/ís__adj"/></e>
<e lm="monitori"><i>monit</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="caqui"><i>caqui</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="euriè"><i>euri</i><par n="ali/è__adj"/></e>
<e lm="esquerre"><i>esquerr</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="indonesi"><i>indon</i><par n="indon/esi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="escarlata"><i>escarlata</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="inepte"><i>inept</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vernacle"><i>vernacl</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="marró"><i>marr</i><par n="marr/ó__adj"/></e>
<e lm="discontinu"><i>discont</i><par n="cont/inu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ros"><i>ros</i><par n="ros__adj"/></e>
<e lm="relicte"><i>relict</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="subjecte"><i>subject</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="admonitori"><i>admonit</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="elevat"><i>eleva</i><par n="triparti/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="imprecís"><i>imprec</i><par n="imprec/ís__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grec"><i>gre</i><par n="ce/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="suís"><i>su</i><par n="su/ís__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beix"><i>beix</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sacre"><i>sacr</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exculpatori"><i>exculpat</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="feixuc"><i>feixu</i><par n="ce/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="notori"><i>not</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="belga"><i>belg</i><par n="belg/a__adj"/></e>
<e lm="groc"><i>gro</i><par n="ami/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="quíntuple"><i>quíntupl</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trist"><i>trist</i><par n="trist__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ocre"><i>ocre</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sud"><i>sud</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="antibala"><i>antibala</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="magre"><i>magr</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heterogeni"><i>heterog</i><par n="heterog/eni__adj"/></e>
<e lm="preparatori"><i>preparat</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amic"><i>ami</i><par n="ami/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lila"><i>lila</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="submís"><i>subm</i><par n="imprec/ís__adj"/></e>
<e lm="obscè"><i>obsc</i><par n="ali/è__adj"/></e>
<e lm="libi"><i>l</i><par n="amf/ibi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="cec"><i>ce</i><par n="ce/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="esclerofil·le"><i>esclerofil·l</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="erroni"><i>err</i><par n="err/oni__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ambigu"><i>ambig</i><par n="ambig/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="intermedi"><i>interm</i><par n="interm/edi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bivalve"><i>bivalv</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="amfibi"><i>amf</i><par n="amf/ibi__adj"/></e>
<e lm="satisfactori"><i>satisfact</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="obac"><i>oba</i><par n="ce/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gras"><i>gras</i><par n="gros__adj"/></e>
<e lm="indecís"><i>indec</i><par n="imprec/ís__adj"/></e>
<e lm="noruec"><i>norue</i><par n="ce/c__adj"/></e>
<e lm="concís"><i>conc</i><par n="imprec/ís__adj"/></e>
<e lm="benigne"><i>benign</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="taronja"><i>taronja</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="continu"><i>cont</i><par n="cont/inu__adj"/></e>
<e lm="exploratori"><i>explorat</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nord"><i>nord</i><par n="multimèdia__adj"/></e>
<e lm="assertori"><i>assert</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="escalè"><i>escal</i><par n="ali/è__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bípede"><i>bíped</i><par n="adept/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="obligatori"><i>obligat</i><par n="access/ori__adj"/></e>
<e lm="serè"><i>ser</i><par n="ali/è__adj"/></e>
